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DTC P 1220/14TimingControlSystemMalfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The engine ECU control the injection timing by actuating the timing control valve. The timing control valve
is mounted on the injection pump and controls the pump internal fuel pressure through duty control.
The engine ECU detects the injection advance angle by TDC and NE signals.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P1220/14
After engine warm up and during, actual injection timing is
different fromtargetvalueofengineECUcalculated forseveral
sec.

SOpenorshort in timingcontrol valvecircuit
STimingcontrol valve
SFuel filter (Clogging)
SFuel (Freezing,Air in)
S Injectionpump(Internalpressureand timingcontrol valve)
SEngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check timing control valve (See Pub No. RM617E, page FU−11 3).

NG Check and replace injection pump
(See Pub No. RM617E, page FU−11 3).

OK

2 Check voltage between terminal TCV of engine ECU connector and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E16 connector of the engine ECU.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminal TCV of the engine ECU
connector and body ground.
OK:

Voltage: 9 to 14 V

OK Go to step 3.

NG

Check for open or short in harness and connector between timing control valve and engine ECU,
timing control valve and EFI OR ECD relay (See page IN−1 9) .
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3 Check timing control valve operation.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect theoscilloscopebetween terminalsTCVandE 1

of the engine ECU.
(b) Start the engine.
CHECK:
Check thewaveformbetween terminalsTCVandE 1 of theen-
gine ECU when the engine is idling.
OK:

Thecorrectwaveformsareasshown.

NGCheckandreplaceengineECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

OK

4 Check fuel filter clogging, fuel freezing and fuel air in.

NG Replace or repair.

OK

Checkandreplace injectionpump(SeePubNo.RM6 17E,pageFU −113).


